dictsource/so_rules
// Somali translation rules

.group a
        a          a:
        aa         &:

.group b
        b          b
        bb         b:

.group c
        c          a:'i:

.group d
        d          d
        dd         d:

.group e
        e          e
        ee         e:

.group f
        f          f

.group g
        g          g
        gg         g:

.group h
        h          h

.group i
        i          i
        iy         ij:

.group j
        j          dZ

.group k
        k          k
        kk         k:

.group l
        l          l
        ll         l:

.group m
        m          m
        mm         m:

.group n
        n          n
        nn         n:

.group o
        o          o
        oo         o:

.group p
        p          p
        pp         p:

.group q
        q          q
        qq         q:

.group r
        r          r
        rr         r:

.group s
        s          s
        ss         s:

.group t
        t          t
        tt         t:

.group u
        u          u
        uu         u:

.group v
        v          v

.group w
        w          w

.group x
        x          x
        xx         xx

.group y
        y          y
        yy         y:

.group z
        z          ts
        zz         ts


.group dh
        dh         D

.group ny
        ny         n^

.group ph
        ph         P
